Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.420

Unlawful acts enumerated. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

It is unlawful for any person:

(1) To falsely claim to be an agent or representative of any nursery dealer in horticultural plants or Christmas tree grower;

(2) To sell or distribute horticultural plants by any method which has the capacity and tendency or effect of deceiving any purchaser or prospective purchaser as to the quantity, size, grade, kind, species, age, method of propagation, maturity, condition, vigor, hardiness, number of times transplanted, growth ability, growth characteristics, rate of growth or time required before flowering or fruiting, price, origin or place where grown, or in any other material respect;

(3) To alter an official certificate or other official inspection document for plant materials, including Christmas trees, covered by this chapter or to falsely represent a document as an official certificate;

(4) To substitute any horticultural plant, Christmas tree, or agricultural commodity for a horticultural plant, Christmas tree, or agricultural commodity covered by an inspection certificate.

[ 2007 c 335 s 13; 2000 c 144 s 20; 1993 c 120 s 12; 1990 c 261 s 11; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 18.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.420

Unlawful acts enumerated. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

It is unlawful for any person:

(1) To falsely claim to be an agent or representative of any nursery dealer in horticultural plants;

(2) To sell or distribute horticultural plants by any method which has the capacity and tendency or effect of deceiving any purchaser or prospective purchaser as to the quantity, size, grade, kind, species, age, method of propagation, maturity, condition, vigor, hardiness, number of times transplanted, growth ability, growth characteristics, rate of growth or time required before flowering or fruiting, price, origin or place where grown, or in any other material respect;

(3) To alter an official certificate or other official inspection document for plant materials covered by this chapter or to falsely represent a document as an official certificate;

(4) To substitute any horticultural plant or agricultural commodity for a horticultural plant or agricultural commodity covered by an inspection certificate.

[ 2000 c 144 s 20; 1993 c 120 s 12; 1990 c 261 s 11; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 18.]